District of Columbia statutes.
29-607.03

Dissociated partner’s liability to other persons.

(a)

A partner’s dissociation shall not of itself discharge the partner’s liability for a partnership debt, obligation, or other liability incurred before dissociation. A dissociated partner shall not be liable for a partnership debt, obligation, or other liability incurred after dissociation, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

A partner that dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business shall be liable as a partner to the other party in a transaction entered into by the partnership, or a surviving partnership under subchapter IX of this chapter, within 2 years after the partner’s dissociation, only if the partner is liable for the obligation under § 29-603.06 and at the time of entering into the transaction the other party:

(1)

Reasonably believed that the dissociated partner was then a partner;

(2)

Did not have notice of the partner’s dissociation; and

(3)

Is not deemed to have had knowledge under § 29-603.03(e) or notice under § 29-607.04(c).

(c)

By agreement with the partnership creditor and the partners continuing the business, a dissociated partner may be released from liability for a partnership debt, obligation, or other liability.

(d)

A dissociated partner shall be released from liability for a partnership debt, obligation, or other liability if a partnership creditor, with notice of the partner’s dissociation but without the partner’s consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of a partnership debt, obligation, or other liability.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(7)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 703 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “debt, obligation, or other liability” for “obligation” in (a), (c) and (d).
2001 Ed., § 33-107.03.
1981 Ed., § 41-157.3.
This section is referenced in § 29-607.04, § 29-608.09, § 29-608.11, and § 29-609.03.